North Carolina, session 2025, HB10.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Establishment. – (a) The Committee shall consist of seven members,
appointed as follows:
(1) Two members appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives as
follows:
a. One member appointed from two candidates submitted for
consideration by the Majority Leader of the House of Representatives.
b. One member appointed from two candidates submitted for
consideration by the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.
(2) Two members appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate as
follows:
a. One member appointed from two candidates submitted for
consideration by the Majority Leader of the Senate.
b. One member appointed from two candidates submitted for
consideration by the Minority Leader of the Senate.
(3) Three members appointed by the Governor.
In the appointment of the members to the Committee, consideration may be given to
an individual's current or previous employment, profession, or affiliations, or knowledge or
expertise that may be relevant to the Committee's study.
(b) The Governor shall call for the first Committee meeting no later than 30 days after
this act is effective. The members of the Committee shall appoint a chair. The Committee shall
meet upon the call of the chair. A quorum of the Committee shall be a majority of the Committee
members.
SECTION 2. Duties. – The Committee shall study and make recommendations on
adjusting the State's current travel allowances for State officers, employees, teachers, and
members of boards, commissions, and the General Assembly. As part of its study, the Committee
shall consider the following:
(1) History of the State's travel allowances and per diem and mileage rates.
(2) Federal reimbursement rates.
*H10-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Consultations with individuals in the following fields and industries:
a. Hospitality industry, specifically food and lodging.
b. Accounting.
c. Human Resources.
d. Personnel Management.
e. Education.
(4) Any matters the Committee deems relevant and instructive.
The Committee may establish subcommittees to carry out the duties of the
Committee.
SECTION 3. Report. – The Committee shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations no later than
March 15, 2026. The Committee shall terminate upon the submission of its report or on March
15, 2026, whichever occurs first.
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 10-First Edition